fi: Mukana tulevat leikkisarjan toiminnot: Kiipeilyverkko; Kiipeilykupoli; Kiipeilytikkaat; Kiipeilyseinä; Kerhotalo/linnake; Liukutanko; Glider-keinu; Voimistelurenkaat; Apinatikkaat; Piknikpöytä; Leikkimökin katto/katos; Kiipeilyseinän otteet sisältyvät; Kiipeilyköysi; Köysitikkaat; Hiekkalaatikkoalue; Keinulauta; Liukumäki; Keinut; Trapetsitanko; Muu
bg-BG: Включени са дейности в комплекта за игра: Мрежа за катерене; Купол за катерене; Стълба за катерене; Стена за катерене; Къщичка/крепост; Пожарникарски лост; Люлка тип планер; Гимнастически халки; Маймунска стълба; Маса за пикник; Покрив/сенник за къщичка за игра; Включени хватки за стена за катерене; Въже за катерене; Въжена стълба; Пясъчник; Люлка везна; Пързалка; Люлки; Трапец; Други
ro-RO: Activități incluse în setul de joacă: Plasă de cățărat; Dom de cățărat; Scară de cățărat; Perete de escaladă; Căsuță/fortăreață; Bară de pompieri; Leagăn dublu (glider); Inele de gimnastică; Bare de cățărat (monkey bars); Masă de picnic; Acoperiș/baldachin pentru căsuță de joacă; Prize pentru perete de escaladă incluse; Cățărare pe frânghie; Scară de frânghie; Zonă cu nisip; Balansoar; Tobogan; Leagăne; Bară de trapez; Altele
pl: Dołączone aktywności zestawu do zabawy: Siatka do wspinaczki; Kopuła wspinaczkowa; Drabinka; Ścianka wspinaczkowa; Domek/baza; Rura strażacka; Huśtawka wagowa; Kółka gimnastyczne; Przeplotnia; Stół piknikowy; Dach/zadaszenie domku; Chwyty wspinaczkowe w zestawie; Lina do wspinaczki; Drabinka linowa; Miejsce na piaskownicę; Huśtawka wagowa; Zjeżdżalnia; Huśtawki; Drążek do podciągania; Inne
ja: 遊具セットのアクティビティが含まれています: カーゴネット; クライミングドーム; クライミングラダー; クライミングウォール; クラブハウス/砦; 消防士のポール; グライダースイング; 吊り輪; うんてい; ピクニックテーブル; プレイハウスの屋根/キャノピー; ロックウォールグリップ付き; ロープ登り; ロープラダー; 砂場エリア; シーソー/ティーター; すべり台; ブランコ; トラピーズバー; その他
hu: Játszótéri készletben található elemek: Mászóháló; Mászókupola; Mászólétra; Mászófal; Klubodú/erőd; Tűzoltórúd; Kétüléses hinta; Tornaűrűk; Majomlétra; Piknikasztal; Játszóház tető/napellenző; Mászófal-fogantyúkkal; Mászókötél; Kötéllétra; Homokozó; Mérleghinta; Csúszda; Hinták; Trapézrúd; Egyéb
pt-BR: Playset atividades incluídas: Rede de escalada; Domo de escalada; Escada de escalada; Parede de escalada; Casinha/forte; Poste de bombeiro; Balanço vai e vem; Argolas de ginástica; Trepa-trepa; Mesa de piquenique; Teto/toldo da casinha; Inclui agarras de parede de escalada; Corda de escalada; Escada de corda; Caixa de areia; Gangorra; Escorregador; Balanços; Barra de trapézio; Outro
it: Attività del parco giochi incluse: Rete da arrampicata; Cupola da arrampicata; Scala da arrampicata; Parete da arrampicata; Casetta/fortino; Pertica dei pompieri; Altalena a due posti; Anelli da ginnastica; Spalliera sospesa; Tavolo da picnic; Tetto/tettuccio per casetta; Prese da parete incluse; Corda da arrampicata; Scala di corda; Sabbiera; Altalena a bilico; Scivolo; Altalene; Trapezio; Altro
en: Playset activities included: Cargo net; Climbing dome; Climbing ladder; Climbing wall; Clubhouse/fort; Fireman pole; Glider swing; Gym rings; Monkey bars; Picnic table; Playhouse roof/canopy; Rock wall grips included; Rope climb; Rope ladder; Sandbox area; See-saw/teeter; Slide; Swings; Trapeze bar; Other
zh-CN: 游乐组合活动项目: 攀爬网; 攀爬架; 攀爬梯; 攀岩墙; 俱乐部/堡垒; 消防滑竿; 滑翔秋千; 吊环; 攀爬架; 野餐桌; 游戏屋顶/顶篷; 含攀岩墙抓手; 爬绳; 绳梯; 沙盒区; 跷跷板; 滑梯; 秋千; 秋千单杠; 其他
pt-PT: Atividades do conjunto de brinquedos incluídas: Rede de escalada; Cúpula de escalada; Escada de escalada; Parede de escalada; Casinha/forte; Varão de bombeiro; Baloiço deslizante; Argolas de ginástica; Barras de suspensão; Mesa de piquenique; Telhado/toldo de casinha; Agarre de parede de escalada incluído; Corda de escalada; Escada de corda; Caixa de areia; Baloiço; Escorrega; Baloiços; Barra de trapézio; Outras
el: Οι δραστηριότητες του σετ παιχνιδιού περιλαμβάνουν: Δίχτυ αναρρίχησης; Θόλος αναρρίχησης; Σκάλα αναρρίχησης; Τοίχος αναρρίχησης; Σπιτάκι/οχυρό; Στύλος πυροσβέστη; Κούνια τραμπάλα; Κρίκοι γυμναστικής; Πολύζυγο; Τραπέζι πικνίκ; Οροφή/σκέπαστρο σπιτιού; Περιλαμβάνονται λαβές τοίχου αναρρίχησης; Σχοινί αναρρίχησης; Ανεμόσκαλα; Χώρος με άμμο; Τραμπάλα; Τσουλήθρα; Κούνιες; Μπάρα ακροβατικών; Άλλο
de: Enthaltene Spielset-Aktivitäten: Kletternetz; Kletterkuppel; Kletterleiter; Kletterwand; Spielhaus/Fort; Rutschstange; Gondelschaukel; Turnringe; Klettergerüst; Picknicktisch; Spielhausdach/Sonnensegel; Klettersteine enthalten; Kletterseil; Strickleiter; Sandkastenbereich; Wippe; Rutsche; Schaukeln; Trapezstange; Sonstige
fr: Activités incluses dans la structure de jeu: Filet à grimper; Dôme d’escalade; Échelle d’escalade; Mur d’escalade; Cabane/fort; Barre de pompier; Balançoire face à face; Anneaux de gymnastique; Échelle horizontale; Table de pique-nique; Toit de cabane/auvent; Prises de mur d’escalade incluses; Corde à grimper; Échelle de corde; Bac à sable; Balançoire à bascule; Toboggan; Balançoires; Barre de trapèze; Autre
sl-SI: Vključene dejavnosti igralnega kompleta: Tovorna mreža; Plezalna kupola; Plezalna lestev; Plezalna stena; Igralna hišica / trdnjava; Gasilski drog; Gugalnica glider; Gimnastični krogi; Plezala (monkey bars); Piknik miza; Streha/nadstrešek igralne hišice; Vključeni oprimki za plezalno steno; Vrv za plezanje; Lestev iz vrvi; Peskovnik; Prevesnica; Tobogan; Gugalnice; Trapez; Drugo
es: Se incluyen actividades del juego: Red de carga; Domo de escalada; Escalera de escalada; Muro de escalada; Casita/fuerte; Tubo de bombero; Columpio planeador; Anillas de gimnasia; Pasamanos; Mesa de pícnic; Techo/dosel de casita; Agarres para muro de escalada incluidos; Escalada de cuerda; Escalera de cuerda; Arenero; Sube y baja; Tobogán; Columpios; Barra de trapecio; Otro
nb: Lekesettaktiviteter inkludert: Klatrenett; Klatrekuppel; Klatrestige; Klatrevegg; Klubbhus/fort; Brannmannstang; Glider-huske; Turnringer; Armgangsstativ; Piknikbord; Lekehustak/kalesje; Klatregrep inkludert; Klatretau; Taustige; Sandkasseområde; Vippehuske; Sklie; Husker; Trapesstang; Annet
sv: Lekset – aktiviteter som ingår: Klätternät; Klätterkupol; Klätterstege; Klättervägg; Klubbhus/koja; Brandmansstång; Glidgunga; Romerska ringar; Armgång; Picknickbord; Lekhustak/soltak; Klättergrepp ingår; Klätterrep; Repstege; Sandlådeområde; Gungbräda; Rutschkana; Gungor; Trapets; Övrigt
tr: Dahil olan oyun alanı aktiviteleri: Kargo filesi; Tırmanma kubbesi; Tırmanma merdiveni; Tırmanma duvarı; Kulüp binası/kale; İtfaiyeci direği; Planör salıncak; Jimnastik halkaları; Maymun merdiveni; Piknik masası; Oyun evi çatısı/gölgelik; Tırmanma duvarı tutamakları dahil; İpe tırmanma; İp merdiven; Kum havuzu alanı; Tahterevalli; Kaydırak; Salıncaklar; Trapez bar; Diğer
ko: 놀이 세트 포함 활동: 카고 네트; 클라이밍 돔; 클라이밍 사다리; 암벽 등반; 클럽하우스/요새; 소방관 폴; 글라이더 그네; 짐 링; 구름사다리; 피크닉 테이블; 플레이하우스 지붕/캐노피; 암벽 그립 포함; 로프 등반; 로프 사다리; 모래놀이 구역; 시소/티터; 미끄럼틀; 그네; 공중그네 바; 기타
hr-HR: Uključene aktivnosti u kompletu za igru: Teretna mreža; Kupola za penjanje; Ljestve za penjanje; Zid za penjanje; Kućica/utvrda; Vatrogasna šipka; Ljuljačka s dvije sjedalice; Gimnastički krugovi; Vodoravne ljestve; Stol za piknik; Krov kućice / nadstrešnica; Uključeni su hvatovi za zid za penjanje; Uže za penjanje; Ljestve od užeta; Prostor s pješčanikom; Klackalica; Tobogan; Ljuljačke; Trapez šipka; Ostalo
ru: Включенные игровые активности игрового набора: Сетка для лазания; Купол для лазания; Лестница для лазания; Скалодром; Домик/форт; Пожарный шест; Качели-балансир; Гимнастические кольца; Рукоход; Столик для пикника; Крыша/навес домика; В комплекте зацепы для скалодрома; Канат для лазания; Веревочная лестница; Песочница; Качели-балансир; Горка; Качели; Трапеция; Другое
nl: Speelset activiteiten inbegrepen: Klimnet; Klimkoepel; Klimladder; Klimmuur; Clubhuis/fort; Brandweerpaal; Zweefschommel; Turnringen; Klimrek; Picknicktafel; Speelhuisdak/-luifel; Inclusief klimstenen; Klimtouw; Touwladder; Zandbakgedeelte; Wipwap; Glijbaan; Schommels; Trapezestok; Overig
da: Medfølgende legesætaktiviteter: Klatrenet; Klatrekuppel; Klatrestige; Klatrevæg; Klubhus/fort; Brandmandsstang; Dobbeltgynge; Gymnastikringe; Armgangsstativ; Picnicbord; Legehustag/kaleche; Klatregreb medfølger; Klatrereb; Rebstige; Sandkasseområde; Vippe; Rutsjebane; Gynger; Trapezstang; Andet
lt-LT: Įtrauktos žaidimų aikštelės veiklos: Laipiojimo tinklas; Laipiojimo kupolas; Laipiojimo kopėčios; Laipiojimo sienelė; Klubo namelis / fortas; Gaisrininko stulpas; Sūpuoklės-sklandytuvas; Gimnastikos žiedai; Laipiojimo skersiniai; Iškylos stalas; Žaidimų namelio stogas / stogelis; Pridėtos laipiojimo sienelės atramos; Laipiojimo virvė; Virvinės kopėčios; Smėliadėžės zona; Svirtinės sūpynės; Čiuožykla; Sūpynės; Trapecijos skersinis; Kita
sk-SK: Aktivity obsiahnuté v hernej súprave: Sieť na lezenie; Lezecká kupola; Rebrík na lezenie; Lezecká stena; Klubovňa/pevnosť; Hasičská tyč; Dvojmiestna hojdačka; Gymnastické kruhy; Ručkovacia preliezačka; Piknikový stôl; Strecha/strieška domčeka; Súčasťou sú úchyty na lezeckú stenu; Šplhacie lano; Lanový rebrík; Pieskovisko; Prevažovacia hojdačka; Šmykľavka; Hojdačky; Hrazda; Iné
th: กิจกรรมในชุดของเล่นประกอบด้วย: ตาข่ายปีนป่าย; โดมปีนป่าย; บันไดปีน; หน้าผาจำลอง; คลับเฮาส์/ป้อมปราการ; เสารูด; ชิงช้าไกว; ห่วงยิมนาสติก; บาร์โหน; โต๊ะปิกนิก; หลังคา/ผ้าใบกันสาดบ้านเด็กเล่น; รวมที่จับหน้าผาจำลอง; เชือกปีน; บันไดเชือก; พื้นที่กระบะทราย; ไม้กระดก; สไลเดอร์; ชิงช้า; บาร์โหนกายกรรม; อื่นๆ
cs: Aktivity v herní sadě, které jsou součástí: Šplhací síť; Prolézací kopule; Lezecký žebřík; Lezecká stěna; Domeček/pevnost; Požární tyč; Houpačka pro dva (kluzák); Gymnastické kruhy; Ručkovací žebřík; Piknikový stůl; Střecha/stříška domečku; Včetně chytů pro lezeckou stěnu; Šplhací lano; Provazový žebřík; Pískoviště; Páková houpačka; Skluzavka; Houpačky; Hrazda; Jiné
vi: Các hoạt động trong bộ đồ chơi bao gồm: Lưới leo trèo; Mái vòm leo trèo; Thang leo trèo; Tường leo núi; Nhà chòi/pháo đài; Cột cứu hỏa; Xích đu đôi; Vòng đu xà; Xà đu tay; Bàn dã ngoại; Mái/mái che nhà chơi; Kèm tay nắm leo núi; Dây leo trèo; Thang dây; Khu vực hố cát; Bập bênh; Cầu trượt; Xích đu; Thanh xà đu; Khác
zh-TW: 玩具組內含活動: 攀爬網; 攀爬架; 攀爬梯; 攀岩牆; 遊戲屋/堡壘; 消防滑桿; 滑翔機鞦韆; 體操吊環; 攀爬架; 野餐桌; 遊戲屋屋頂/天篷; 包含攀岩牆握把; 攀爬繩; 繩梯; 沙坑區; 蹺蹺板; 溜滑梯; 鞦韆; 高空鞦韆棒; 其他